Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 33. Compensation for property taken.

Private property shall not be taken or damaged for public or private use without just compensation.

Cross references. —

See also art. 10, §§ 9, 14, Wyo. Const., and ch. 26 of title 1.

Action for inverse condemnation.—

Trial court properly emphasized that in the absence of eminent domain proceedings the action was an inverse condemnation case because eminent domain proceedings were not used by a county for the expansion of a road; according to the county, it did not need to use eminent domain proceedings because it already had an easement for the project. Byrnes v. Johnson Cty. Comm'rs, 2020 WY 6, 455 P.3d 693,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2020).

This section supplements § 32 of this article.

Snell v. Ruppert, 541 P.2d 1042,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1975), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Legislature cannot infringe upon or take from property owners the right to be compensated,

according to the requirement of this section. State Highway Comm'n v. Peters, 416 P.2d 390,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1966).

“Property”

as contained in this section, for which an owner must receive “just compensation” when taken or damaged by a condemnor, is treated as a word of most general import and is liberally construed. It is addressed to every sort of interest the citizen may possess, and there is nothing to indicate that the legislature, in providing the right of setoff for benefits, used the word “property” in any different sense. State Highway Comm'n v. Rollins, 471 P.2d 324,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1970).

“Damaged” and “injuriously affected” are synonymous. —

The term “damaged” used in constitution and term “injuriously affected” used in various sections of condemnation statute are synonymous. Hirt v. Casper, 56 Wyo. 57, 103 P.2d 394,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1940); Barber v. State Highway Comm'n, 80 Wyo. 340, 342 P.2d 723,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1959); Wyoming State Highway Dep't v. Napolitano, 578 P.2d 1342,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1978).

Damaged property must suffer some diminution in substance.

Sheridan Drive-in Theatre v. State, 384 P.2d 597,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1963).

Or be rendered intrinsically less valuable. —

See Sheridan Drive-in Theatre v. State, 384 P.2d 597,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1963).

And section has no application to depreciation in value caused by proximity of public improvement. —

This section has no application to depreciation in the market value of land caused by some public improvement in close proximity thereto, where there is no physical injury to the property or impairment of any right appurtenant thereto. Sheridan Drive-in Theatre v. State, 384 P.2d 597,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1963).

If public use is not of such character as to constitute nuisance. —

See Sheridan Drive-in Theatre v. State, 384 P.2d 597,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1963).

Airplane overflight, without impact on surface, not “taking” of property. —

The mere fact of airplane overflight, without evidence of impact on the surface (i.e., substantial interference with the use and enjoyment of the surface), did not create a constitutional claim against either the city or its airport board, which adopted an ordinance providing a height limitation in a noninstrument approach zone to the airport, for the “taking” of property through the creation of a flight easement. In addition, the flight easement utilized by airplanes was not created by the passage of the ordinance, but by federal and state declarations of public navigability and by repeated overflights which preceded the home owner's action by considerably more than the 10 years allowed by the applicable statute of limitations (§

1-3-103

). Cheyenne Airport Bd. v. Rogers, 707 P.2d 717,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 579

(Wyo. 1985).

Height limitation in noninstrument approach zone to airport legitimate exercise of police power. —

A city ordinance providing a height limitation in a noninstrument approach zone to an airport was an exercise of the police power, and certain home owners who had a tree in violation of this limitation, who were notified they would have to trim it, and who challenged the constitutionality of the ordinance, failed to demonstrate such a significant impact on their plot as a whole as to counterbalance the significant public interest in protecting the airport flight path. Cheyenne Airport Bd. v. Rogers, 707 P.2d 717,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 579

(Wyo. 1985).

Not every injury to property is covered

by the constitutional guarantee that private property shall not be taken or damaged for public or private use without just compensation. Coronado Oil Co. v. Grieves, 642 P.2d 423,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1982).

Damage for which compensation is to be made is a damage to the property itself.

Sheridan Drive-in Theatre v. State, 384 P.2d 597,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1963).

And not personal inconvenience or injury. —

A mere personal inconvenience or injury, such as damage to a business, is not sufficient to entitle the owner to compensation. Sheridan Drive-in Theatre v. State, 384 P.2d 597,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1963).

Inconvenience resulting from construction work which is temporary and reasonable in its character and which is intended for public safety and convenience is an inconvenience which property owners share with the general public, and compensation for such inconvenience is not allowable as long as the obstructions are temporary and reasonable. State Highway Comm'n v. Peters, 416 P.2d 390,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1966).

Emotional distress is not a proper element of damages in an inverse condemnation action.

See Miller v. Campbell County, 854 P.2d 71,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1993).

Consequential damages to landowners' remaining property are compensable

under the protection afforded by this section. Wyoming State Highway Dep't v. Napolitano, 578 P.2d 1342,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1978).

Special damage must differ in kind, not degree, from public's damages. —

A property owner may recover under the “or damaged” provision of this section only when he has sustained special damage differing in kind and not merely in degree from that sustained by the public generally. Sheridan Drive-in Theatre v. State, 384 P.2d 597,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1963).

And requires physical injury or impairment of appurtenant right. —

The classification of special damage requires a definite physical injury or impairment of a right appurtenant to the land, such as drying up wells and springs, destroying lateral supports, preventing surface waters from running off adjacent lands or running surface waters onto adjacent lands or depositing foreign materials on neighboring lands. Sheridan Drive-in Theatre v. State, 384 P.2d 597,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1963).

Property injured by negligence is not taken or damaged for public use. —

Where an injury involves a tort, being caused by the negligence of public officers or their agents, it cannot be said that property is taken or damaged for public use. Chavez v. Laramie, 389 P.2d 23,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1964).

Where allegations of the plaintiffs make it clear the crushing of a sewer line and severing of a water main, with resulting damage to their property, were accidental and unintentional and certainly served no public purpose, there was absent a taking or damaging of property for public use. Chavez v. Laramie, 389 P.2d 23,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1964).

Hence, allegation that property was damaged is insufficient. —

Plaintiffs' allegation that their property was damaged is not enough, since according to this section they would be entitled to compensation from the public only if they alleged and proved their property was damaged for public use. Chavez v. Laramie, 389 P.2d 23,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1964).

Damages to abutting property. —

Where proposed condemnation of portion of street involved damage to abutting property owners, it was a “taking” requiring compensation, unless other countervailing reasons should exist. Hirt v. Casper, 56 Wyo. 57, 103 P.2d 394,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1940).

Taking fee in land for way of necessity. —

Statute permitting fee in land to be taken for way of necessity does not deny due process of law or take property without compensation. Meyer v. Colorado Cent. Coal Co., 39 Wyo. 355, 271 P. 212,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1928).

Establishment of a roadway, in the absence of consent,

constitutes the taking of property by the county for which a party may make a claim for compensation according to constitutional requirements. Kern v. Deerwood Ranch, 528 P.2d 910,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1974).

City may condemn land. —

Act authorizing city to condemn land within or without the corporate limits is not violative of this or any other provision of the constitution. Edwards v. Cheyenne, 19 Wyo. 110, 114 P. 677,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1911), reh'g denied, 19 Wyo. 110, 122 P. 900,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1912).

Proposed modification to basements underlying sidewalks

does not constitute a taking of private property without just compensation where title to the lands underlying the streets and sidewalks is in the city. Blount v. City of Laramie, 510 P.2d 294,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1973).

Sewer assessments. —

A statute authorizing certain cities to apportion sewer assessments against adjacent land, according to its area, will not be held unconstitutional, under this section, in absence of showing of its unconstitutional operation in an individual case. McGarvey v. Swan, 17 Wyo. 120, 96 P. 697,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1908).

Special assessments for drainage districts

do not contravene this section. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

Irrigation district law

was not unconstitutional as taking property without just compensation. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Revolving local improvement fund. —

This section is not violated by ch. 155, Laws 1953, authorizing a municipality to set up a revolving local improvement fund from the proceeds of city or state gasoline or state cigarette license taxes, from which fund the city may annually deposit in the local improvement district fund a sum sufficient to meet the difference between the principal amount of assessments due that year and the amount of assessments actually collected that year. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Legislature may not prohibit occupations, unless detrimental

to public welfare. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Unemployment Compensation Act,

in taking money of employer and giving it to persons who have never been in his employ, serves a public purpose for welfare of all and does not violate this section. Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

Failure to refund compulsory contributions to pension account not violative of section. —

The failure to provide for the refund of compulsory contributions to the firemen's pension account to former firemen who have served in that capacity for less than five years is not a taking of their private property for public or private use without just compensation in violation of this section. Atkinson v. Wittler, 647 P.2d 72,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 352

(Wyo. 1982).

Regulation of use of highways. —

Control of highways may in proper cases be extended to prohibiting their use, and legislature may subject private carriers to appropriate regulations. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Courts must determine in first instance whether legislature can prohibit use of highways in particular case, and whether regulation amounting to prohibition is reasonable. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

State or municipal highway regulations must be reasonable, operate with equality and have tendency to accomplish object in view. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Statute prohibiting use of highways by motor transportation companies, except under certificate and subject to regulation by public service commission, is void as applied to private carriers, under this section. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Regulating rates and routes of motor carriers. —

Motor Vehicle Act, making it unlawful for motor carrier to charge less than rate fixed by public service commission and providing that rate and route should not be changed except by order of the commission, does not violate this section. State v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 192, 53 P.2d 13,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1935).

Statute requiring annual dipping of sheep

did not take property without compensation.
State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1920).

Measure of damages. —

Under this section, property is damaged when it is made less valuable, less useful or less desirable. The measure of damages in such case is the difference between the fair market value before and after the inflicting of the damage. Hence, it is immaterial whether such damage occurs by reason of the construction or the maintenance of a project, so long as it is directly attributable to such causative factor, and irrespective of whether there has been an actual physical taking of any part of such property. The depreciation in value, however, must be by reason of damage to the land itself or to property rights therein. Personal inconvenience or discomfort to the owner, or interference with the business conducted on the land, is not compensable unless such results are causative factors in the depreciation in the value of the land. Wyoming State Highway Dep't v. Napolitano, 578 P.2d 1342,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1978).

Board of equalization must use full value. —

Constitutional provisions deny constitutional or implied legislatively delegable authority to the state board of equalization to set any assessment ratio which would effectively determine the actual tax, except to use full value. Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State Bd. of Equalization, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 749 P.2d 221,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied, 749 P.2d 221,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1988).

Filing of claims with state not limitation upon guaranteed rights. —

Article 16, § 7, Wyo. Const., which commands the filing of claims with the officer or officers whose duty it may be to audit the same before money can be paid out of the state treasury, is of equal dignity with this section. In fact, the two provisions are not in conflict. The rights afforded by this section are protected even though the directives of art. 16, § 7, Wyo. Const., are complied with, since art. 16, § 7, Wyo. Const., is no more than a regulation of the procedure by which the rights guaranteed by this section will be exercised. It is not a substantive limitation imposed upon such rights. Wyoming State Highway Dep't v. Napolitano, 578 P.2d 1342,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1978).

Wyoming Governmental Claims Act not applicable to inverse condemnation action. —

Wyoming Governmental Claims Act (WGCA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-39-101

to

1-39-121

, did not apply to inverse condemnation actions because there was nothing about the constitutional and statutory right to an inverse condemnation action, and nothing about the WGCA that reasonably suggested that the former should be subject to the latter, as the WGCA abrogated governmental immunity for certain listed torts, while inverse condemnation was not a tort and was a constitutional and statutory remedy that never was subject to governmental immunity. 2013 WY 3,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 2

.

Filing of statutory claim notice with state, pursuant to § 9-2-332 (now §

9-1-404

), held reasonable as section not self-executing. —

See Wyoming State Highway Dep't v. Napolitano, 578 P.2d 1342,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1978).

Statute of limitations on filing claims for compensation. —

A statute limiting the time within which to file claims for compensation does not violate this section. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Statute of limitations barred action. —

Limitation period found in Wyoming Governmental Claims Act applied to an inverse condemnation cause of action and to the homeowners' tort claims against a city, and where the undisputed material facts showed that the complaint had been filed well beyond one-year period set forth in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-114

, the claims were time-barred, and the district court was correct in applying its statute of limitation analysis to all of the state law claims and in dismissing the action on summary judgment. Lankford v. City of Laramie, 2004 WY 143, 100 P.3d 1238,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2004).

Effect of acceptance of award. —

If the compensation has been accepted by the landowner, it matters not how the amount of the award was arrived at since such landowner will not be heard to complain after having accepted the money. Sterritt v. Young, 14 Wyo. 146, 82 P. 946,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1905).

Award not excessive. —

Award of jury for $500.00 in value and $15,000.00 in damages was not so excessive as to denote passion, bias and prejudice. State Highway Comm'n v. Peters, 416 P.2d 390,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1966).

Implied easements do not effect a taking. —

Parcel owners' claim that an implied easement for an apartment building effectuated a takings was properly rejected given case law holding that land subject to an easement passed with that easement and the enforcement or recognition of that easement did effect a taking. Miner v. Jesse & Grace, LLC, 2014 WY 17, 317 P.3d 1124,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

M & B Drilling & Constr. Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 706 P.2d 243,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 560

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

Thomas v. Jultak, 68 Wyo. 198, 231 P.2d 974,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1950); Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 578 P.2d 1359,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1978); Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978); Bush v. Duff, 754 P.2d 159,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1988); Mayland v. Flitner, 2001 WY 69, 28 P.3d 838,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2001); Bush Land Dev. Co. v. Crook Cnty. Weed & Pest Control Dist., 2017 WY 12, 388 P.3d 536,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Grover Irrigation & Land Co. v. Lovella Ditch, Reservoir & Irrigation Co., 21 Wyo. 204, 131 P. 43,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 15

, L.R.A. (n.s.) 1916C1275 (1913);
Public Serv. Comm'n v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 158, 53 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 15

, 109 A.L.R. 534 (1935);
Griffith ex rel. Workmen's Comp. Dep't v. Stephenson, 494 P.2d 546,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1972);
Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974);
Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 662 P.2d 878,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1983);
Miller v. Campbell County, 722 F. Supp. 687, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11685 (D. Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Constitutionality of the Wyoming Underground Water Statute,” see 3 Wyo. L.J. 140.

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).

For case note, “Water Rights — Impairment of Existing Water Rights Under the Wyoming Watershed Act. Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 83 (1984).

For comment, “Solar Access Rights in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 419 (1984).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For comment, “Death of the Dark Ages? The Troubled Law of Easements in Wyoming,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 151 (1992).

For case note, “Wildlife — Private Property Damage Law — Once Upon a Time in Wyoming There was Room for Millions of Cattle and Enough Habitat for Every Species of Game to Find a Luxurious Existence. In the Aftermath of Parker, Can We All Still Get Along?
Parker Land and Cattle Company v. Wyoming Game and Fish Commission, 845 P.2d 1040,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1993),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 89 (1994).

For case note, “Real Property — Wyoming's Private Road Statutes: Approaching a Dead End? Lindt v. Murray, 895 P.2d 459,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 443 (1996)

For article, “The Endangered Species Act and Private Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 479 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Good will as element of damages for condemnation of property on which private business is conducted, 81 ALR3d 198.

Right of owner of land not originally taken or purchased as part of adjacent project to recover, on enlargement of project to include adjacent land, enhanced value of property by reason of proximity to original land, 95 ALR3d 752.

Validity and construction of law regulating conversion of rental housing to condominiums, 21 ALR4th 1083.

Governmental liability for compensation or damages to advertiser arising from obstruction of public view of sign or billboard on account of growth of vegetation in public way, 21 ALR4th 1309.

Airport operations or flight of aircraft as constituting taking or damaging of property, 22 ALR4th 863.

Damages resulting from temporary conditions incident to public improvements or repairs as compensable taking, 23 ALR4th 674.

Seizure of property as evidence in criminal prosecution or investigation as compensable taking, 44 ALR4th 366.

Validity, construction and application of state relocation assistance laws, 49 ALR4th 491.

Inverse condemnation state court class actions, 49 ALR4th 618.

Measure of damages or compensation in eminent domain as affected by premises being restricted to particular educational, religious, charitable or noncommercial use, 29 ALR5th 36.